Utah statutes.
41-1a-1503.   Event data recorders -- Retrieval or disclosure of event data.

(1) (a)  Event data that is recorded on an event data recorder:

(i)  is private;

(ii)  is the personal information of the motor vehicle's owner; and

(iii)  except as provided in Subsection (2), may not be retrieved by a person who is not the owner of the motor vehicle.

(b)  If a motor vehicle is owned by more than one person, only one owner is required to consent to the retrieval or use of the data from a motor vehicle event data recorder.

(2)  Event data that is recorded on an event data recorder may be retrieved, obtained, or used by a person who is not the owner of the motor vehicle in the following circumstances:

(a)  the owner of the motor vehicle or the owner's agent has consented to the retrieval of the data;

(b)  the data is retrieved by a motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle manufacturer, or by an automotive technician to diagnose, service, or repair the motor vehicle at the request of the owner or the owner's agent;

(c)  the data is subject to discovery in a criminal prosecution or pursuant to the rules of civil procedure in a claim arising out of a motor vehicle accident;

(d)  a court or administrative agency having jurisdiction orders the data to be retrieved;

(e)  a peace officer retrieves the data pursuant to a court order as part of an investigation of a suspected violation of a law that has caused, or contributed to the cause of, an accident resulting in damage of property or injury to a person; or

(f)  to facilitate or determine the need for emergency medical care for the driver or passenger of a motor vehicle that is involved in a motor vehicle crash or other emergency, including the retrieval of data from a company that provides subscription services to the owner of a motor vehicle for in-vehicle safety and security communications.

(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), a person who has retrieved, obtained, or used event data under Subsection (2) may not release event data that is recorded on an event data recorder.

(4)  A person may release event data that is recorded on an event data recorder in the following circumstances:

(a)  the owner of the motor vehicle or the owner's agent has consented to the release of the data;

(b)  the data is subject to discovery in a criminal prosecution or pursuant to the rules of civil procedure in a claim arising out of a motor vehicle accident;

(c)  the data is released pursuant to a court order as part of an investigation of a suspected violation of a law that has caused, or contributed to the cause of, an accident resulting in damage of property or injury to a person; or

(d)  if the identity of the owner or driver is not disclosed, the data is released to a motor vehicle safety and medical research entity or data processor in order to advance motor vehicle safety, security, or traffic management.

(5) (a)  If a motor vehicle is equipped with an event data recorder that is capable of recording or transmitting event data and that capability is part of a subscription service, the fact that the event data may be recorded or transmitted shall be disclosed in the subscription service agreement.

(b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, event data from an event data recorder may be retrieved, obtained, and used by a subscription service provider for subscription services meeting the requirement of Subsection (5)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 189, 2013 General Session

